North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-10 General Rules of the Road

39-10-01.
Provisions of title refer to vehicles upon the highways — Exceptions.

The provisions of this title relating to the operation of vehicles apply to the operation of vehicles upon highways or other places open to the public for the operation of vehicles except when a different place is specifically referred to in a given section.

The provisions of this title, or equivalent ordinances, relating to reporting of accidents, careless driving, exhibition driving, drag racing, reckless or aggravated reckless driving, driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or controlled substances, or fleeing or attempting to elude a peace officer apply upon highways and elsewhere.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1001; S.L. 1961, ch. 262, § 1; 1975, ch. 349, § 12; 1983, ch. 436, § 1.

Cross-References.

General penalty for violation of title, see § 39-07-06.

Persons under the influence of intoxicating liquor or controlled substances not to operate vehicle, see § 39-08-01.

39-10-01.1.
Required obedience to traffic laws.

It is unlawful and, unless otherwise declared in this chapter or in chapter 39-06.1 with respect to particular offenses, it is a class B misdemeanor for any person to do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 13.

39-10-02.
Obedience to police officer or firefighter.

No person may willfully refuse to comply with any lawful order or direction of any police officer or firefighter invested by law with authority to direct, control, or regulate traffic.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1002; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 14.

39-10-02.1.
Person riding animal or driving animal-drawn vehicle.

In addition to any special regulations, any person riding an animal or driving any animal-drawn vehicle upon a roadway must be granted all of the rights and is subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle by this chapter, except those provisions which by their very nature can have no application.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 9; 1975, ch. 348, § 2.

39-10-03.
Class A authorized emergency vehicles.

The driver of a class A authorized emergency vehicle may:

Park or stand, irrespective of the provisions of this chapter.

Proceed past a red or stop signal or stop sign, but only after slowing down as may be necessary for safe operation.

Exceed the speed limit so long as the driver does not endanger life or property.

Disregard regulations governing direction of movement or turning in specified directions.

The exceptions herein granted to a class A authorized emergency vehicle apply only:

When the authorized emergency vehicle is in pursuit of or apprehension of a violator or a suspected violator requiring the use of these exemptions.

When the class A authorized emergency vehicle is being operated in response to a reported emergency involving a possible personal injury, death, or damage to property, and when giving adequate warning by use of an oscillating, rotating, revolving, or flashing red or combination red and white lights that are visible under normal atmospheric conditions for at least five hundred feet [152.4 meters] and if appropriate, giving audible signal by siren or airhorn. A firetruck, ambulance, or law enforcement vehicle that is otherwise a class A authorized emergency vehicle may display an oscillating, rotating, revolving, or flashing blue light in addition to and under the same conditions as the other colors allowed in this subdivision.

In any instance when the head of a law enforcement agency deems advisable within the area of that person’s jurisdiction for the protection of person and property and when giving audible signal by siren or when giving adequate warning by use of an oscillating, rotating, revolving, or flashing red or combination red and white lights which are visible under normal atmospheric conditions for at least five hundred feet [152.4 meters]. A firetruck, ambulance, or law enforcement vehicle that is otherwise a class A authorized emergency vehicle may display an oscillating, rotating, revolving, or flashing blue light in addition to and under the same conditions as the other colors allowed in this subdivision.

A class A authorized emergency vehicle may display a steady red or red and blue lamp that is visible under normal atmospheric conditions for at least five hundred feet [152.4 meters] when involved in an incident, emergency, or any other related activity.

Any law enforcement officer as provided in paragraph 2 of subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 39-01-01 having stopped another vehicle along a highway, and while still involved in that incident, or any other related activity, may use amber lights, visible under normal atmospheric conditions for at least five hundred feet [152.4 meters], for the purpose of maintaining traffic flow.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1003; S.L. 1959, ch. 288, § 2; 1963, ch. 264, § 3; 1965, ch. 276, § 1; 1979, ch. 424, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 392, § 4; 1983, ch. 437, § 1; 2003, ch. 326, § 1; 2007, ch. 330, § 1; 2013, ch. 281, § 2; 2019, ch. 325, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

39-10-03.1.
Class B authorized emergency vehicles.

The driver of a class B authorized emergency vehicle may:

Park or stand, irrespective of the provisions of this chapter.

Exceed the speed limit so long as the driver does not endanger life or property during the time of a local or national disaster.

Disregard regulations governing direction of movement or turning in specified directions.

The exceptions granted in this section to a class B authorized emergency vehicle apply only when the authorized emergency vehicle is displaying an amber and white light visible under normal atmospheric conditions for a distance of five hundred feet [152.4 meters] in any direction, and:

When it is necessary for the authorized emergency vehicle to use these exemptions for the immediate protection of life or property;

When an authorized emergency vehicle is stopped on a highway for the purpose of performing a duty as required of the driver; or

When traveling at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 264, § 4; 2015, ch. 271, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 271, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

39-10-03.2.
Class C authorized emergency vehicles.

All class B specifications apply to class C authorized emergency vehicles except that a blue flashing light must be displayed in place of an amber light as provided in section 39-10-03.1.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 262, § 2; 1979, ch. 401, § 2; 1987, ch. 438, § 2; 2005, ch. 16, § 26; 2011, ch. 260, § 2.

39-10-04.
Obedience to and required traffic-control devices.

The driver of any vehicle shall obey the instructions of any official traffic-control device applicable thereto placed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, unless otherwise directed by a traffic or police officer, subject to the exceptions granted the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle in this chapter.

No provision of this chapter for which traffic-control devices are required may be enforced against an alleged violator if at the time and place of the alleged violation an official device is not in proper position and sufficiently legible to be seen by an ordinarily observant person. Whenever a state statute does not state that devices are required, such statute is effective even though no devices are erected or in place.

Whenever official traffic-control devices are placed in positions approximately conforming to the requirements of this title, such devices must be presumed to have been so placed by the official act or direction of lawful authority, unless the contrary is established by competent evidence.

Any official traffic-control device placed pursuant to the provisions of this title and purporting to conform to the lawful requirements pertaining to such devices must be presumed to comply with the requirements of this title, unless the contrary is established by competent evidence.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1004; S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 10; 1967, ch. 312, § 2; 1975, ch. 349, § 15.

Collateral References.

Stop-and-go signal: liability for automobile accident other than direct collision with pedestrian as affected by reliance on or disregard of stop-and-go signal, 2 A.L.R.3d 12.

Stop-and-go signal: liability for collision of automobile with pedestrian at intersection as affected by reliance on or disregard of stop-and-go signal, 2 A.L.R.3d 155.

Yield sign: liability for automobile accident at intersection as affected by reliance upon or disregard of “yield” sign or signal, 2 A.L.R.3d 275.

Sign or signal other than stop-and-go signal, liability for collision of automobile with pedestrian at intersection as affected by reliance on or disregard of, 3 A.L.R.3d 557.

Stop signal or sign: liability for automobile accident at intersection as affected by reliance on or disregard of unchanging stop signal or sign, 3 A.L.R.3d 180.

Caution signal: liability for automobile accident at intersection as affected by reliance on or disregard of unchanging caution, slow, danger or like sign or signal, 3 A.L.R.3d 507.

39-10-05.
Traffic-control signal legend.

Whenever traffic is controlled by traffic-control signals exhibiting different colored lights, or colored lighted arrows, successively one at a time or in combination, only the colors green, red, and yellow may be used, except for special pedestrian signals carrying a word or legend, and said lights must indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles and pedestrians as follows:

Green indications:

Vehicular traffic facing a circular green indication may proceed straight through or turn right or left unless a sign at such place prohibits either such turn. But vehicular traffic, including vehicles turning right or left, shall yield the right of way to other vehicles and to pedestrians lawfully within the intersection or an adjacent crosswalk at the time such signal is exhibited.

Vehicular traffic facing a green arrow indication, shown alone or in combination with another indication, may cautiously enter the intersection only to make the movement indicated by such arrow or such other movement as is permitted by other indications shown at the same time. Such vehicular traffic shall yield the right of way to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the intersection.

Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided for in section 39-10-06, pedestrians facing any green indication, except when the sole green indication is a turn arrow, may proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked crosswalk.

Steady yellow indication:

Vehicular traffic facing a steady circular yellow or yellow arrow indication is thereby warned that the related green movement is being terminated or that a red indication will be exhibited immediately thereafter when vehicular traffic may not enter the intersection.

Pedestrians facing a steady circular yellow or yellow arrow indication, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided for in section 39-10-06, are thereby advised that there is insufficient time to cross the roadway before a red indication is shown and no pedestrian may then start to cross the roadway.

Steady red indication:

Vehicular traffic facing a steady circular red indication alone shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or if none, then before entering the intersection and shall remain standing until an indication to proceed is shown, except as provided for in subdivision c.

Vehicular traffic facing a steady red arrow indication may not enter the intersection to make the movement indicated by the arrow and, unless entering the intersection to make a movement permitted by another indication, must stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or if none, then before entering the intersection and must remain standing until an indication permitting the movement indicated by the red arrow is shown except as provided for in subdivision c.

Except when a sign is in place prohibiting a turn, vehicular traffic facing any steady red indication may cautiously enter the intersection to turn right, or to turn left from a one-way street into a one-way street, after stopping as required by subdivisions a and b. Such vehicular traffic shall yield the right of way to pedestrians lawfully within adjacent crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the intersection.

Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided for in section 39-10-06, pedestrians facing a steady circular red or red arrow indication alone may not enter the roadway.

In the event an official traffic-control signal is erected and maintained at a place other than an intersection, the provisions of this section are applicable, except as to those provisions which by their nature can have no application. Any stop required must be made at a sign or marking on the pavement indicating where the stop must be made, but in the absence of any such sign or marking the stop must be made at the signal.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 6; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1005; S.L. 1969, ch. 343, § 1; 1973, ch. 304, § 1; 1975, ch. 347, § 1; 1977, ch. 358, § 1; 1999, ch. 349, § 1.

39-10-06.
Pedestrian control signals.

Whenever special pedestrian-control signals exhibiting the words “Walk” or “Don’t Walk” or the symbols of a walking person, symbolizing “Walk”, or an upraised hand, symbolizing “Don’t Walk” are in place, such signals must indicate as follows:

“Walk”: Pedestrians facing such indication may proceed across the roadway in the direction of the indication and must be given the right of way by the drivers of all vehicles.

“Don’t Walk” (steadily illuminated): A pedestrian may not start to cross the roadway in the direction of such indication.

“Don’t Walk” (flashing): A pedestrian may not start to cross the roadway in the direction of the indication, but any pedestrian who has partially completed a crossing during the “Walk” signal must proceed in the direction of the indication to a sidewalk or safety island.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 7; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1006; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 16; 1999, ch. 349, § 2.

Cross-References.

Pedestrians, general rules as to, see §§ 39-10-27 to 39-10-34.

Collateral References.

Who is “pedestrian” entitled to rights and subject to duties provided by traffic regulations or judicially stated, 35 A.L.R.4th 1117.

39-10-07.
Flashing signals.

Whenever an illuminated flashing red or yellow light is used in a traffic signal or with a traffic sign, it requires obedience by vehicular traffic as follows:

Flashing red (stop indication). When a red lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, drivers of vehicles shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, or, if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering it, and the right to proceed is subject to the rules applicable after making a stop at a stop sign.

Flashing yellow (caution indication). When a yellow lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, drivers of vehicles may proceed through the intersection or past such indication only with caution.

Flashing red arrow and flashing yellow arrow indications have the same meaning as the corresponding flashing circular indications, except that they apply only to drivers of vehicles intending to make the movement indicated by the arrow.

This section does not apply at railroad grade crossings. Conduct of drivers of vehicles approaching railroad grade crossings is governed by the requirements set forth in section 39-10-41.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 8; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1007; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 17; 1987, ch. 73, § 20; 1999, ch. 349, § 3.

39-10-07.1.
Lane-direction – control signals.

When lane-direction-control signals are placed over the individual lanes of a street or highway, vehicular traffic may travel in any lane over which a green signal is shown, but may not enter or travel in any lane over which a red signal is shown.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 2.

39-10-07.2.
Display of unauthorized signs, signals, or markings.

No person may place, maintain, or display upon or in view of any highway, any unauthorized sign, signal, marking, or device which purports to be or is an imitation of or resembles an official traffic-control device or railroad sign or signal, or which attempts to direct the movement of traffic, or which hides from view or interferes with the effectiveness of an official traffic-control device or any railroad sign or signal.

No person may place or maintain nor may any public authority permit upon any highway any traffic sign or signal bearing thereon any commercial advertising.

This section may not be deemed to prohibit the erection upon private property adjacent to highways of signs giving useful directional information and of a type that cannot be mistaken for official signs.

Every such prohibited sign, signal, or marking is hereby declared to be a public nuisance and the authority having jurisdiction over the highway is hereby empowered to remove the same or cause it to be removed without notice when located on highway right of way.

No person may place, maintain, or display upon or within the right of way of any highway any sign, post, pole, mailbox, or signal which has a red lamp or red reflector visible to traffic. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to official traffic devices, lamps, or reflectors on motor vehicles or bicycles, or railroad signals or signs.

This section does not prohibit the use of portable battery-powered warning devices emitting a flashing red light placed upon a highway to alert oncoming traffic to a disabled or stopped motor vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 3; 1977, ch. 359, § 1; 2003, ch. 327, § 1.

39-10-07.3.
Interference with official traffic-control device or railroad sign or signal.

A person may not, without lawful authority, attempt to or in fact alter, deface, injure, knock down, remove, or interfere with the operation of any official traffic-control device or any railroad sign or signal or any inscription, shield, or insignia thereon, or any other part thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 18; 2005, ch. 336, § 1.

39-10-08.
Drive on right side of roadway — Exceptions.

Upon all roadways of sufficient width a vehicle must be driven upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows:

When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction under the rules governing such movement;

When an obstruction exists making it necessary to drive to the left of the center of the highway; provided, any person so doing shall yield the right of way to all vehicles traveling in the proper direction upon the unobstructed portion of the highway within such distance as to constitute an immediate hazard;

Upon a roadway divided into three marked lanes for traffic under the rules applicable thereon; or

Upon a roadway restricted to one-way traffic.

Upon all roadways any vehicle proceeding at less than the normal speed of traffic at the time and place and under the conditions then existing must be driven in the right-hand lane then available for traffic, or as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway, except when overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction or when preparing for a left turn in an intersection or into a private road or driveway.

Upon any roadway having four or more lanes for moving traffic and providing for two-way movement of traffic, no vehicle may be driven to the left of the centerline of the roadway, except when authorized by official traffic-control devices designating certain lanes to the left side of the center of the roadway for use by traffic not otherwise permitted to use such lanes, or except as permitted under subdivision b of subsection 1. However, this subsection may not be construed as prohibiting the crossing of the centerline in making a left turn into or from an alley, private road, or driveway.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 9; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1008; S.L. 1963, ch. 264, § 6; 1975, ch. 347, § 4.

39-10-09.
Passing vehicles proceeding in opposite directions.

Drivers of vehicles proceeding in opposite directions shall pass each other to the right, and upon roadways having width for not more than one line of traffic in each direction each driver shall give to the other at least one-half of the main-traveled portion of the roadway as nearly as possible.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 10; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1009.

Collateral References.

Rights, duties, and liability with respect to narrow bridge or passage as between motor vehicles approaching from opposite directions, 47 A.L.R.2d 142.

39-10-10.
Use of multiple-beam road-lighting equipment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 20.

39-10-11.
Overtaking a vehicle on the left.

The following rules govern the overtaking and passing of vehicles proceeding in the same direction, subject to those limitations, exceptions, and special rules hereinafter stated:

The driver of a vehicle overtaking another vehicle proceeding in the same direction shall pass to the left thereof at a safe distance and may not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely clear of the overtaken vehicle.

Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted, the driver of an overtaken vehicle shall give way to the right in favor of the overtaking vehicle on audible signal and may not increase the speed of that driver’s vehicle until completely passed by the overtaking vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 12; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1011; S.L. 1971, ch. 374, § 2; 1975, ch. 349, § 19.

39-10-11.1.
Overtaking and passing a bicycle.

The driver of a vehicle shall leave a safe distance when overtaking and passing a bicycle proceeding in the same direction on a roadway and shall maintain clearance until safely clear of the overtaken bicycle. “Safe distance” as used in this section means no less than three feet [0.91 meters] clearance.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 297, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

39-10-12.
When overtaking on the right is permitted.

The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass upon the right of another vehicle only under the following conditions:

When the vehicle overtaken is making or about to make a left turn; or

Upon a roadway with unobstructed pavement of sufficient width for two or more lines of vehicles moving lawfully in the direction being traveled by the overtaking vehicle.

The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass another vehicle upon the right only under conditions permitting such movement in safety. Such movement may not be made by driving off the roadway.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 13; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1012; S.L. 1963, ch. 264, § 7; 1975, ch. 349, § 20.

Collateral References.

Reckless driving in overtaking and passing vehicle, 52 A.L.R.2d 1337.

Intersection, duty to keep to right, 53 A.L.R.2d 850.

Automobiles: liability for U-turn collisions, 53 A.L.R.4th 849.

39-10-13.
Limitations on overtaking on the left.

No vehicle may be driven to the left side of the center of the roadway in overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction unless such left side is clearly visible and is free of oncoming traffic for a sufficient distance ahead to permit such overtaking and passing to be completely made without interfering with the operation of any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction or any vehicle overtaken. In every event the overtaking vehicle must return to an authorized lane of travel as soon as practicable, and in the event the passing movement involves the use of a lane authorized for vehicles approaching from the opposite direction, before coming within two hundred feet [60.96 meters] of any approaching vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 14; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1013; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 21.

39-10-14.
Further limitations on driving on left of center of roadway.

No vehicle may be driven to the left side of the roadway under any of the following conditions:

When approaching or upon the crest of a grade or a curve in the highway where the driver’s view is obstructed within such distance as to create a hazard in the event another vehicle might approach from the opposite direction.

When approaching within one hundred feet [30.48 meters] of or traversing any intersection or railroad grade crossing.

When the view is obstructed upon approaching within one hundred feet [30.48 meters] of any bridge, viaduct, or tunnel.

The foregoing limitations do not apply upon a one-way roadway, nor under the conditions described in section 39-10-08, nor to the driver of a vehicle turning left into or from an alley, private road, or driveway.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 15; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1014; S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 5.

39-10-15.
No-passing zones.

The director and local authorities are hereby authorized to determine those portions of any highway under their respective jurisdiction where overtaking and passing or driving on the left side of the roadway would be especially hazardous and may by appropriate signs or markings on the roadway indicate the beginning and end of such zones and when such signs or markings are in place and clearly visible to an ordinarily observant person, every driver of a vehicle shall obey the directions thereof.

Where signs or markings are in place to define a no-passing zone as set forth in subsection 1, no driver may at any time drive on the left side of the roadway within such no-passing zone or on the left side of any pavement striping designed to mark such no-passing zone throughout its length.

This section does not apply under the conditions described in section 39-10-08 nor to the driver of a vehicle turning left into or from an alley, private road, or driveway.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 16; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1015; S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 11; 1975, ch. 347, § 6.

39-10-16.
One-way roadways and rotary traffic islands.

The director and local authorities with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions may designate any highway, roadway, part of a roadway, or specific lanes upon which vehicular traffic shall proceed in one direction at all or such times as shall be indicated by official traffic-control devices.

Upon a roadway so designated for one-way traffic, a vehicle shall be driven only in the direction designated at all or at such times as shall be indicated by official traffic-control devices.

A vehicle passing around a rotary traffic island must be driven only to the right of such island.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 17; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1016; S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 7.

Collateral References.

One-way street, duty and liability of vehicle driver approaching intersection of one-way street with other street, 62 A.L.R.2d 275.

39-10-17.
Driving on roadways laned for traffic.

Whenever any roadway has been divided into two or more clearly marked lanes for traffic, the following rules in addition to all others consistent herewith apply:

A vehicle must be driven as nearly as practicable entirely within a single lane and may not be moved from such lane until the driver has first ascertained that such movement can be made with safety.

Upon a roadway which is divided into three lanes and provides for two-way traffic, a vehicle may not be driven in the center lane except when overtaking and passing another vehicle traveling in the same direction when such center lane is clear of traffic within a safe distance, or in preparation for making a left turn or where such center lane is at the time allocated exclusively to traffic moving in the same direction that the vehicle is proceeding and such allocation is designated by official traffic-control devices.

Official traffic-control devices may be erected directing specified traffic to use a designated lane or designating those lanes to be used by traffic moving in a particular direction regardless of the center of the roadway and drivers of vehicles shall obey the directions of every such device.

Official traffic-control devices may be installed prohibiting the changing of lanes on sections of roadway and drivers of vehicles shall obey the directions of every such device.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 18; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1017; S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 8.

39-10-18.
Following too closely.

The driver of a motor vehicle may not follow another vehicle more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having due regard for the speed of such vehicles and the traffic upon and the condition of the highway.

The driver of any truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle when traveling upon a roadway outside of a business or residence district and which is following another truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle shall, whenever conditions permit, leave sufficient space so that an overtaking vehicle may enter and occupy such space without danger, except that this does not prevent a truck or motor vehicle drawing another vehicle from overtaking and passing any vehicle or combination of vehicles.

Motor vehicles being driven upon any roadway outside of a business or residence district in a caravan or motorcade whether or not towing other vehicles must be so operated as to allow sufficient space between each such vehicle or combination of vehicles so as to enable any other vehicle to enter and occupy such space without danger. This provision does not apply to funeral processions.

This section does not apply to the operation of a non-lead vehicle in a platoon.

As used in this section and section 39-10-74, “platoon” means a group of motor vehicles using vehicle-to-vehicle communications to travel in a unified manner at close following distances on a multilane, limited-access, divided highway.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 19; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1018; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 22; 2019, ch. 329, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

39-10-19.
Driving on divided highway.

Whenever any highway has been divided into two or more roadways by leaving an intervening space or by a physical barrier or clearly indicated dividing section so constructed as to impede vehicular traffic, every vehicle must be driven only upon the right-hand roadway, unless directed or permitted to use another roadway by official traffic-control devices or police officers. No vehicle may be driven over, across, or within any such dividing space, barrier, or section, except through an opening in such physical barrier or dividing section or space or at a crossover or intersection as established by public authority, unless such crossing is specifically prohibited and such prohibition is indicated by appropriate traffic-control devices.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 20; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1019; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 23.

39-10-20.
Restricted access.

No person may drive a vehicle onto or from any controlled-access roadway except at such entrances and exits as are established by public authority.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 257, § 21; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1020.

39-10-21.
Restrictions on use of controlled-access roadway.

The director may by order, and local authorities may by ordinance, with respect to any controlled-access roadway under their respective jurisdictions, prohibit the use of any such roadway by any class or kind of traffic which is found incompatible with the normal and safe movement of traffic.

The director or the local authority adopting any such prohibition shall erect and maintain official traffic-control devices on the controlled-access roadway on which such prohibitions are applicable and when in place no person may disobey the restrictions stated on such devices.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 22; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1021; S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 3.

39-10-21.1.
Closing road because of hazardous conditions — Posting of official traffic-control devices — Entering closed road prohibited.

The highway patrol or local law enforcement authorities having jurisdiction over a road may close a road temporarily due to hazardous conditions for the protection and safety of the public. If such a closing is made, the authority ordering the closing shall make every reasonable attempt to notify the public and, when practical, may post appropriate official traffic-control devices to advise motorists of the closing.

An individual, while operating a motor vehicle, may not knowingly enter a road closed which is posted with an appropriate traffic-control device at the point of entry.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 436, § 2; 1989, ch. 470, § 1; 2011, ch. 280, § 2.

39-10-22.
Vehicle approaching or entering intersection.

If a vehicle approaches or enters an intersection that does not have an official traffic-control device and another vehicle approaches or enters from a different highway at approximately the same time, the driver of the vehicle on the left shall yield the right of way to the vehicle on the right. If the intersection is T-shaped and does not have an official traffic-control device, the driver of the vehicle on the terminating street or highway shall yield to the vehicle on the continuing street or highway.

If a vehicle approaches an intersection that has traffic-control signals that usually exhibit different colored lights and the signals are not lit, the driver of the vehicle shall stop and yield as required under subsection 2 of section 39-10-24.

The right-of-way rule declared in this section is modified at through highways and otherwise as stated in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 23; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1022; S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 20; 1969, ch. 344, § 1; 1975, ch. 349, § 24; 1995, ch. 381, § 1; 2007, ch. 331, § 1.

39-10-22.1.
Entering freeways — Right of way.

A vehicle entering a freeway, as defined in section 24-01-01.1, from an acceleration lane, ramp, or any other approach road shall yield the right of way to a vehicle on the main roadway entering the merging area at the same time, regardless of whether the approach road is to the left or the right of the main roadway, unless posted signs indicate otherwise.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 438, § 1.

39-10-23.
Vehicle turning left.

The driver of a vehicle intending to turn to the left within an intersection or into an alley, private road, or driveway shall yield the right of way to any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction which is within the intersection or so close thereto as to constitute an immediate hazard.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 24; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1023; S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 12; 1975, ch. 349, § 25.

39-10-24.
Stop signs and yield signs.

Preferential right of way may be indicated by stop signs or yield signs as authorized in section 39-07-03.

Except when directed to proceed by a police officer, every driver of a vehicle approaching a stop sign shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering it. After having stopped, the driver shall yield the right of way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time when such driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways.

The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign shall in obedience to such sign slow down to a speed reasonable for the existing conditions and, if required for safety to stop, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, or, if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection, or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering it. After slowing or stopping, the driver shall yield the right of way to any vehicle in the intersection or approaching on another roadway so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard during the time such driver is moving across or within the intersection or junction of roadways. Provided, however, that if a driver is involved in a collision with a vehicle in the intersection or junction of roadways after driving past a yield sign without stopping, such collision is deemed prima facie evidence of the driver’s failure to yield the right of way.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 25; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1024; S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 13; 1975, ch. 349, § 26.

Collateral References.

Sudden or unsignaled stop or slowing of motor vehicles, negligence as to crossing vehicle, 29 A.L.R.2d 5.

Duty of motor vehicle driver approaching place where children are crossing or about to cross, 30 A.L.R.2d 5.

Custom and practice of drivers of motor vehicles as affecting question of negligence at intersections, 77 A.L.R.2d 1327.

Stop-and-go signal, liability for automobile accident other than direct collision with pedestrian as affected by reliance upon or disregard of, 2 A.L.R.3d 12.

Stop-and-go signal, liability for collision of automobile with pedestrian at intersection as affected by reliance upon or disregard of, 2 A.L.R.3d 155.

Yield sign: liability for automobile accident at intersection as affected by reliance upon or disregard of “yield” sign or signal, 2 A.L.R.3d 275.

Stop signal or sign, liability for automobile accident at intersection as affected by reliance upon or disregard of unchanging, 3 A.L.R.3d 180.

Sign or signal other than stop-and-go signal, liability for collision of automobile with pedestrian at intersection as affected by reliance upon or disregard of, 3 A.L.R.3d 557.

Intersection: what is a street or highway intersection within traffic rules, 7 A.L.R.3d 1204.

Public authorities: liability of highway authorities arising out of motor vehicle accident allegedly caused by failure to erect or properly maintain traffic control device at intersection, 34 A.L.R.3d 1008.

Liability for U-turn automobile collisions, 53 A.L.R.4th 849.

39-10-25.
Vehicle entering roadway.

The driver of a vehicle about to enter or cross a roadway from any place other than another roadway shall yield the right of way to all vehicles approaching on the roadway to be entered or crossed.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 26; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1025; S.L. 1963, ch. 264, § 8; 1975, ch. 349, § 27.